vi: Cơ chế điều chỉnh tinh của compa vẽ kỹ thuật: Vít panme; Bánh răng và thanh răng; Chỉ kẹp trượt (không có vi chỉnh); Vít vặn bằng ngón tay cái; Khác
ko: 제도용 컴퍼스 미세 조정 메커니즘: 마이크로미터 나사; 랙 앤 피니언; 슬라이딩 클램프 전용(미세 조정 없음); 썸휠 나사; 기타
es: Mecanismo de ajuste fino del compás: Tornillo micrométrico; Cremallera y piñón; Solo abrazadera deslizante (sin ajuste fino); Tornillo moleteado; Otro
it: Meccanismo di regolazione fine del compasso tecnico: Vite micrometrica; Cremagliera e pignone; Solo morsetto scorrevole (senza regolazione fine); Vite zigrinata; Altro
sv: Finjusteringsmekanism för passare: Mikrometerskruv; Kuggstång; Endast glidklämma (ingen finjustering); Tumhjulsskruv; Övrigt
en: Drafting compass fine adjustment mechanism: Micrometer screw; Rack-and-pinion; Sliding clamp only (no fine adjust); Thumbwheel screw; Other
fr: Mécanisme de réglage fin d'un compas de dessin: Vis micrométrique; À crémaillère; Pince coulissante uniquement (sans réglage micrométrique); Vis moletée; Autre
tr: Teknik pergel ince ayar mekanizması: Mikrometre vidası; Kremayer ve pinyon; Yalnızca kayar kelepçe (hassas ayar yok); Tırtıllı vida; Diğer
de: Mechanismus für Feinjustierung des Zeichenzirkels: Mikrometerschraube; Zahnstange und Ritzel; Nur Gleitklemme (keine Feineinstellung); Rändelschraube; Sonstige
zh-TW: 製圖圓規微調機制: 測微螺絲; 齒輪齒條; 僅有滑動夾具 (無微調); 指輪螺絲; 其他
sk-SK: Mechanizmus jemného nastavenia technického kružidla: Mikrometrická skrutka; Ozubený hrebeň a pastorok; Iba posuvná svorka (bez jemného nastavenia); Skrutka s vrúbkovanou hlavou; Iný
hu: Szerkesztő körző finomállító mechanizmusa: Mikrométercsavar; Fogasléces; Csak csúszószorító (finombeállítás nélkül); Recézett csavar; Egyéb
hr-HR: Mehanizam fine regulacije tehničkog šestara: Mikrometarski vijak; Zupčasta letva; Samo klizna stezaljka (bez finog ugađanja); Nazubljeni vijak; Ostalo
bg-BG: Механизъм за фина настройка на пергел: Микрометричен винт; Зъбна рейка и пиньон; Само плъзгаща се скоба (без фина настройка); Винт с накатка; Друго
ro-RO: Mecanismul de reglaj fin al compasului de desen tehnic: Șurub micrometric; Cremalieră și pinion; Doar clemă culisantă (fără reglaj fin); Șurub cu cap striat; Altele
lt-LT: Braižymo skriestuvo tikslaus reguliavimo mechanizmas: Mikrometrinis varžtas; Krumpliastiebis; Tik slankusis spaustukas (be tikslaus reguliavimo); Reguliavimo ratuko varžtas; Kita
nb: Finjusteringsmekanisme for navigasjonskompass: Mikrometerskrue; Tannstang; Kun glideklemme (ingen finjustering); Tommelhjulskrue; Annet
cs: Mechanismus jemného nastavení rýsovacího kružítka: Mikrometrický šroub; Hřebenový převod; Pouze posuvná svorka (bez jemného nastavení); Kolečkový šroub; Jiné
th: กลไกปรับละเอียดของวงเวียนเขียนแบบ: สกรูไมโครมิเตอร์; แร็คแอนด์พีเนียน; แคลมป์เลื่อนเท่านั้น (ไม่มีตัวปรับละเอียด); สกรูหมุนมือ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Mecanismo de ajuste fino do compasso de desenho: Parafuso micrométrico; Pinhão e cremalheira; Apenas grampo deslizante (sem ajuste fino); Parafuso giratório; Outro
el: Μηχανισμός μικρορύθμισης διαβήτη σχεδίασης: Μικρομετρική βίδα; Κρεμαγιέρα; Μόνο συρόμενος σφιγκτήρας (χωρίς μικρορύθμιση); Βίδα με ροδέλα; Άλλο
fi: Piirustuskompassin hienosäätömekanismi: Mikrometriruuvi; Hammastanko ja -pyörä; Vain liukukiristin (ei hienosäätöä); Säätöpyörä; Muu
ru: Механизм точной настройки циркуля: Микрометрический винт; Зубчато-реечный; Только скользящий зажим (без точной настройки); Рифленый винт; Другое
nl: Fijnafstellingsmechanisme tekenpasser: Micrometerschroef; Tandheugel en rondsel; Alleen schuifklem (geen fijninstelling); Duimwielschroef; Overige
pt-BR: Mecanismo de ajuste fino do compasso de desenho: Parafuso micrométrico; Pinhão e cremalheira; Apenas pinça deslizante (sem ajuste fino); Parafuso rotativo; Outros
zh-CN: 绘图圆规微调装置: 测微螺钉; 齿轮齿条; 仅滑动夹具（无微调）; 指轮螺钉; 其他
ja: 製図用コンパス微調整メカニズム: マイクロメーターねじ; ラックアンドピニオン; スライディングクランプのみ (微調整なし); サムホイールねじ; その他
pl: Mechanizm precyzyjnej regulacji cyrkla: Śruba mikrometryczna; Zębatkowy; Tylko zacisk przesuwny (bez precyzyjnej regulacji); Pokrętło regulacyjne; Inne
da: Finjusteringsmekanisme til passer: Mikrometerskrue; Tandstang; Kun skydeklemme (ingen finjustering); Fingerskrue; Andet
sl-SI: Mehanizem za fino nastavljanje tehničnega šestila: Mikrometrski vijak; Zobata letev in pastorek; Samo drsna sponka (brez fine nastavitve); Vijak s kolescem; Drugo